Tennessee, session 114, HB0119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-12-139(b)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting "commissioner of safety" and substituting "commissioner of revenue".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0119
000174
- 1 -